Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3314.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Kimberley
Gaffett may join Bonnie Phyllis Nolan and David Gaffett Spier in marriage within the Town of
New Shoreham, on or about October 3, 2026. Kimberley Gaffett is hereby authorized and
empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter
3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled “Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006522
========